Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1417.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Community Diaper, BRIEF and Incontinence Products Act.Section 2. Legislative intent.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) The establishment of a grant program GRANTS to provide funding to improve, enhance and expand access to clean diapers will, BRIEFS AND INCONTINENCE PRODUCTS TO protect and enhance the health and well-being of infants, children, incontinent adults and their families.(2) Infants and children who are living in households <--<--<--<--<--<--12345678910111213141516171819 with little or no access to clean diapers often spend a day or longer in one diaper, leading to significant potential health risks.(3) A supply of clean diapers is usually a requirement for infants and children to attend and participate in child-care programs and not having a reliable supply of clean diapers impedes individuals in obtaining and maintaining employment.(4) Most public resources, such as the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) and the Women, Infants and Children Program (WIC), do not help offset the costs of these needed diapers, BRIEFS AND INCONTINENCE PRODUCTS.(5) For incontinent adults, the lack of access to diapers BRIEFS AND INCONTINENCE PRODUCTS is a growing health care concern.(6) Health care experts affirm that when an adult is left wearing a soiled diaper UNDERGARMENT, there is an immediate danger of skin problems, including skin breakdown that can bring on life-threatening infections, especially in older adults.(7) This Commonwealth has a compelling interest in developing programs OPPORTUNITIES that improve access to diapers, BRIEFS AND INCONTINENCE PRODUCTS for infants, children and incontinent adults.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Human Services of the Commonwealth.20250HB1417PN2534 - 2 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Diaper OR BRIEF bank." A nonprofit charitable organization or a fiscally sponsored project of a nonprofit charitable organization that collects or purchases diapers, BRIEFS and other hygiene INCONTINENCE products for infants, children or incontinent adults and regularly distributes diapers, BRIEFS AND INCONTINENCE PRODUCTS over an extended period through two or more partner agencies for eventual distribution to individuals free of charge."Diaper OR BRIEF pantry." A nonprofit charitable organization or a fiscally sponsored project of a nonprofit charitable organization that collects or purchases diapers, BRIEFS OR INCONTINENCE PRODUCTS for the purpose of regularly distributing those diapers ITEMS directly to individuals free of charge."Diaper OR BRIEF program." A program within a nonprofit charitable organization or a fiscally sponsored project of a nonprofit charitable organization, including,f but not limited to, a food bank, service agency or health clinic that collects or purchases diapers, BRIEFS OR INCONTINENCE PRODUCTS and regularly distributes those diapers ITEMS either through direct service free of charge or through two or more partner agencies for eventual distribution to individuals free of charge."Fund." The Community Diaper, BRIEF and Incontinence Products Grant Program Fund established under section 5."Nonprofit charitable organization." A nonprofit organization within the meaning of 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) (relating to exemption from tax on corporations, certain trusts, etc.)."Program." The Community Diaper and Incontinence Products Grant Program established under section 4.20250HB1417PN2534 - 3 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 4. Community Diaper and Incontinence Products Grant Program. DIAPER, BRIEF AND INCONTINENCE PRODUCTS GRANTS.(a) Establishment.--The Community Diaper and Incontinence Products Grant Program is established and shall be administered by the department. The purpose of the program shall be to issue grants to improve, enhance and expand access to clean diapers and incontinence products.(b) Eligibility.--To receive a grant award under the program, a diaper bank, diaper pantry or diaper program must submit a written application to the department by January 1 of each year for which a grant is sought and satisfy the following conditions:(1) Be located within this Commonwealth.(2) Have a budget approved by the board of directors or other governing body of the applicant.(3) Not require participation in religious, financial or organizational activities in order to receive the diapers.(4) Submit a detailed proposal outlining the manner in which the grant money will be used and the intended effect of the proposal.(c) Department action.--The department shall review and approve or disapprove an application within 60 days of receiving the application. An application which has not been approved or disapproved by the department within the 60-day period shall be deemed approved.(d) Publication and notice.--The department shall transmit notice of the availability of the grant program to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin by August 8 for 20250HB1417PN2534 - 4 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 each fiscal year beginning after June 30, 2025.(e) Award of grants.-- THE FOLLOWING SHALL APPLY:(1) The department may, TO THE EXTENT THAT MONEY IS AVAILABLE IN THE FUND, issue a grant award for the following purposes:(i) Direct collection and distribution of diapers, BRIEFS or incontinence products.(ii) Warehousing, shelving and storing of collected diapers, BRIEFS or incontinence products.(iii) Collection bins, volunteer training and other promotional and marketing programs and materials.(iv) Outreach programs, including, but not limited to, mobile diaper OR BRIEF banks, partnerships with child-care centers serving low-income families or partnerships with centers or facilities serving senior citizens OLDER ADULTS.(v) Fundraising assistance and other financial management programs relating to the collection of diapers, BRIEFS OR INCONTINENCE PRODUCTS.(vi) Creating or establishing new diaper OR BRIEF banks, diaper OR BRIEF pantries or diaper OR BRIEF programs, especially in underserved areas of this Commonwealth.(vii) Any other program or activity approved by the department that improves, enhances and expands access to clean diapers, BRIEFS and incontinence products for infants, children and incontinent adults.(2) Grants may not be less than $2,500 nor more than $25,000 annually per eligible applicant.(3) Grants may be awarded on a pro rata basis if the 20250HB1417PN2534 - 5 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 total dollar amount of the approved applications exceeds the amount of funds appropriated by the General Assembly for the program.Section 5. Community Diaper, BRIEF and Incontinence Products Grant Program Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Community Diaper, BRIEF and Incontinence Products Grant Program Fund is established in the State Treasury. All appropriations, contributions and alternative funds received by the department as authorized by State law to improve, enhance and expand access to clean diapers, BRIEFS and incontinence products shall be deposited into the fund.(b) Allocation of funds.--All money in the fund is appropriated on a continuing basis to the department and shall be used as follows:(1) At least 80% of the fund shall be used by the department for grants authorized by this act.(2) Not more than 20% of the fund may be used by the department for State and local administration and program services.(c) Alternative funding.--The department may solicit and accept alternative funding, including Federal funds, grants and donations from any source to assist with the goals of this act. All money received by the department to improve, enhance and expand access to clean diapers, BRIEFS and incontinence products shall be deposited into the fund.Section 6. Reports.The department shall submit an annual report to the General Assembly on expenditures from the fund and the progress of the public outreach required under section 7.20250HB1417PN2534 - 6 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 7 6. Public outreach.(a) General rule.--From the money available for administration as authorized under section 5(b)(2), the department shall conduct Statewide outreach to inform diaper OR BRIEF banks, diaper OR BRIEF pantries, diaper OR BRIEF programs and other appropriate community organizations about the program GRANTS AVAILABLE UNDER THIS ACT.(b) Evaluation.--The department shall evaluate the effectiveness of the funds provided under this act in improving access to clean diapers and incontinence products and make changes as necessary to the outreach described under subsection (a) to improve access to clean diapers and incontinence products.Section 8. Rules and regulations.The department shall promulgate regulations necessary to administer the program and carry out its duties under this act.Section 9 7. Improving access to incontinence supplies.(a) Establishment.--The Department of Aging shall establish a program, in conjunction with local agencies that specialize in aging services, that provides incontinence supplies to individuals 65 years of age or older, including adult diapers BRIEFS, protective undergarments, incontinence pads, absorbent underwear and incontinence medication.(b) Regulations.--The Department of Aging shall promulgate regulations AS necessary to administer the provisions of this section.Section 10 8. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250HB1417PN2534 - 7 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728